New Jersey, session 222, S4524.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2019, c.121 (C.39:4-14.16) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  A low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as defined in R.S.39:1-1, may be operated on the streets, highways, roadways, and bicycle paths of this State, except as otherwise provided in this section, section 2 of P.L.1975, c.250 (C.39:4-14.3), section 9 of P.L.1983, c.105 (C.39:4-14.3i), and P.L.2025, c.285 (C.39:6A-4.8 et al.), and may be parked on a sidewalk provided that the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter does not impede the normal movement of pedestrian or other traffic upon the sidewalk. b.    On and after January 1, 2019, manufacturers and distributors of low-speed electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each low-speed electric bicycle.  The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the low-speed electric bicycle and shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type. c.    A person shall not tamper with or modify a low-speed electric bicycle so as to change the motor-powered speed capability or engagement of a low-speed electric bicycle. d.    A low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter may be operated on bicycle paths, except that a local government entity or State agency may prohibit the operation of low-speed electric bicycles or low-speed electric scooters on bicycle paths under its jurisdiction. e.    Unless permitted by a local government entity or State agency with jurisdiction, a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter shall not be operated on a trail designated for non-motorized traffic if such trail has a natural surface tread made by clearing and grading the soil and no surfacing materials have been added. f.     (1) The operator of a low-speed electric scooter shall not be required to register the low-speed electric scooter or have a driver's license. (2)  The operator of a low-speed electric bicycle shall be required to register the low-speed electric bicycle and have a drivers license to operate the low-speed electric bicycle pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1975, c.250 (C.39:4-14.3). g.    Except as otherwise provided by this section, section 2 of P.L.1975, c.250 (C.39:4-14.3), section 9 of P.L.1983, c.105 (C.39:4-14.3i), section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and P.L.2025, c.285 (C.39:6A-4.8 et al.), all statutes, including the provisions of chapter 4 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, rules, and regulations applicable to bicycles, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1991, c.465 (C.39:4-10.1), shall apply to low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters, except those provisions which by their very nature may have no application to low-speed electric bicycles or low-speed electric scooters. h.    A low-speed electric scooter shall be considered a motor vehicle to the extent required by 23 U.S.C. s.154. i.     No person shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle from dusk to dawn without a reflector installed on the low-speed electric bicycle. j.     No person shall sell, or offer for sale, modification kits designed to turn a low-speed electric bicycle into a motorized bicycle or an electric motorized bicycle. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.285, s.3) 2.    (New section) A person shall not operate a low-speed electric bicycle, as that term is defined in R.S.39:1-1, unless the person wears a protective helmet of a type approved by the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.